Hawaii statutes.
[§198D-1] Definitions. For the purpose
of this chapter:

"Access" means an easement or way:

(1) Over which the general public has the right to
travel; and

(2) Which is used by the general public or intended
for use by the general public primarily to reach or depart a public beach,
shore, park, trail, or other public recreational area.

It includes a lateral easement along the shoreline,
coastline, or beach.

"Department" means the department of
land and natural resources.

"Trail" means an identifiable linear
course used primarily for or used to get a recreational, educational, or
inspirational experience. It includes, but is not limited to:

(1) A corridor trail, which is a designated route,
segregated from a highway, providing a continuous linkage between or among
major urban areas, fragmented accesses, and major trail areas;

(2) A segment or connector trail, which is a
designated route from one locale to another; and

(3) A special use trail, which is a designated course
for a special activity or function. [L 1988, c 236, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next